Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43A O.S. 2021, Section 3-460, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3-460. A. The Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services shall certify assessment personnel for the
purpose of conducting alcohol and drug assessment and evaluation
programs related to driver license revocation.
B. Application fees for certification of assessment personnel
shall be set by the Department to defray the costs of administering
the program and shall be:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1192 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not more
than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) upon initial application; and
2. Not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) and not more than
One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) upon triennial renewal.
C. The fee for those undergoing an assessment and evaluation
pursuant to this section shall be One Hundred Sixty Dollars
($160.00) Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). A fee of Fifteen Dollars
($15.00) shall be remitted by the individual undergoing an
assessment and evaluation directly to the Department of Public
Safety Service Oklahoma pursuant to Section 6-212 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
1. The Department of Public Safety Service Oklahoma shall remit
ninety percent (90%) of the fifteen-dollar fee collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer to be credited to the Community-
based Substance Abuse Revolving Fund in the State Treasury and shall
be used by the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services.
2. Ten percent (10%) of each fifteen-dollar fee collected by
the Department of Public Safety Service Oklahoma pursuant to this
section shall be deposited into the Department of Public Safety
Restricted Revolving Fund Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund, as
created in Section 2-145 Section 3-106 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, to be used for administrative costs associated with the
duties imposed by this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1192 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services is
authorized to promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement
the provisions of Section 3-451 et seq. of this title. Failure to
comply with rules and standards promulgated by the Board shall be
grounds for revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of certification.
E. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall transfer any unobligated monies generated by the fees
in subsection C of this section, deposited before November 1, 2005,
from the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
Revolving Fund to the Community-based Substance Abuse Revolving
Fund, in amounts calculated by the Department.
F. No alcohol or drug assessment personnel shall operate or
continue to operate as such unless the alcohol or drug assessment
personnel comply with the rules promulgated by the Board and are
certified as required by this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1192 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)